Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.10.270

Gift. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5143-S.SL) ***

"Gift" has the definition in RCW 42.52.010.

[ 2024 c 164 s 227.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.